Washington statutes.
RCW 13.38.190

Review of cases—Standards and procedures—Compliance.

(1) The department, in consultation with Indian tribes, shall establish standards and procedures for the department's review of cases subject to this chapter and methods for monitoring the department's compliance with provisions of the federal Indian child welfare act and this chapter. These standards and procedures and the monitoring methods shall also be integrated into the department's child welfare contracting and contract monitoring process.

(2) Nothing in this chapter shall affect, impair, or limit rights or remedies provided to any party under the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1914.

[ 2011 c 309 s 19.]